test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-seljme_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 



  Noun - сельме: # Ordinary nouns 'eye' - full paradigm including MWN
     сельме+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: сельме
     сельме+N+SP+Gen+Indef: сельмень
     сельме+N+SP+Abl+Indef: сельмеда
     сельме+N+SP+Dat+Indef: сельменди
     сельме+N+SP+Abe+Indef: сельмефтома
     сельме+N+SP+Comp+Indef: сельмешка
     сельме+N+SP+Ine+Indef: сельмеса
     сельме+N+SP+Ela+Indef: сельместа
     сельме+N+SP+Ill+Indef: сельмес
     сельме+N+SP+Prl+Indef: сельмева
     сельме+N+SP+Tra+Indef: сельмекс
     сельме+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: сельмезе
     сельме+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: сельмене
     сельме+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: сельмезень
     сельме+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: сельменень
     сельме+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [сельмезенди, сельмезти]
     сельме+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: сельмененди
     сельме+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1: сельмедон
     сельме+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1: сельмефтомон
     сельме+N+SP+Comp+PxSg1: сельмешкан
     сельме+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1: сельмесон
     сельме+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1: сельместон
     сельме+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1: сельмезон
     сельме+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1: сельмеван
     сельме+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: сельмеце
     сельме+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: сельметне
     сельме+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: сельмецень
     сельме+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: сельметнень
     сельме+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2: сельмедот
     сельме+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2: сельмефтомот
     сельме+N+SP+Comp+PxSg2: сельмешкат
     сельме+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2: сельмесот
     сельме+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2: сельместот
     сельме+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2: сельмезт
     сельме+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2: сельмеват
     сельме+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: сельмец
     сельме+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: сельменза
     сельме+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: сельменц
     сельме+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: сельмензон
     сельме+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: сельменцты
     сельме+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: сельмензонды
     сельме+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3: сельмедонза
     сельме+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3: сельмефтомонза
     сельме+N+SP+Comp+PxSg3: сельмешканза
     сельме+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3: сельмесонза
     сельме+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3: сельместонза
     сельме+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3: сельмезонза
     сельме+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3: сельмеванза
     сельме+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1: сельменьке
     сельме+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1: сельменьконь
     сельме+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1: сельменьконди
     сельме+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1: сельмедонк
     сельме+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1: сельмефтомонк
     сельме+N+SP+Comp+PxPl1: сельмешканк
     сельме+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1: сельмесонк
     сельме+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1: сельместонк
     сельме+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1: сельмезонк
     сельме+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1: сельмеванк
     сельме+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2: сельменте
     сельме+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2: сельментень
     сельме+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2: сельментенди
     сельме+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2: сельмедонт
     сельме+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2: сельмефтомонт
     сельме+N+SP+Comp+PxPl2: сельмешкант
     сельме+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2: сельмесонт
     сельме+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2: сельместонт
     сельме+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2: сельмезонт
     сельме+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2: сельмевант
     сельме+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3: сельмесна
     сельме+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3: сельмеснон
     сельме+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3: сельмеснонды
     сельме+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3: сельмедост
     сельме+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3: сельмефтомост
     сельме+N+SP+Comp+PxPl3: сельмешкаст
     сельме+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3: сельмесост
     сельме+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3: сельместост
     сельме+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3: сельмезост
     сельме+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3: сельмеваст
     сельме+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: сельмот
     сельме+N+Sg+Nom+Def: сельмесь
     сельме+N+Sg+Gen+Def: сельметь
     сельме+N+Sg+Dat+Def: сельмети
     сельме+N+Pl+Nom+Def: сельметне
     сельме+N+Pl+Gen+Def: сельметнень
     сельме+N+Pl+Dat+Def: сельметненди    
